Tennessee, session 114, HB1674.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-1-202, is amended by deleting
subdivision (a)(1) and substituting instead:
(1) Supervise and direct all reappraisals and revaluation programs;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1674
010182
- 1 -